New York, session 2025-2026, S6242.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of subdivision 5 of section 401 of the vehicle 2 and traffic law, as amended by chapter 137 of the laws of 1989, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 a. Registrations, reregistrations and renewals shall take effect [and 5 expire] on dates determined by the commissioner and shall expire upon 6 the last day of the month in which the registration is valid. However, 7 where the expiration date of the registration of any vehicle, except a 8 taxi or an omnibus, falls on a Saturday, Sunday or state holiday, such 9 registration shall be valid for the operation of such vehicle until 10 midnight of the next day on which state offices shall be open for busi- 11 ness. Provided, however, that renewal of a registration may be used 12 preceding the expiration date of such registration including such expi- 13 ration date. Provided, further, however, that where the required proof 14 of registration consists of an expired registration for the same vehi- 15 cle, issued to the same person applying for the registration or renewal, 16 and the expired registration certificate and number plates and date tags 17 issued for such registration had not been surrendered to the commission- 18 er on or before the expiration date of such registration, the commis- 19 sioner may in [his] such commissioner's discretion deem such application 20 to be a renewal of the expired registration and require that the fee 21 paid for such registration be computed as if the registration had been 22 made prior to the date of expiration of the expired registration. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect two years after it shall have become a 24 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of 25 any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on 26 its effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before 27 such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04168-03-5